District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.83

Voluntary dissolution proceedings — Revocation by act of corporation.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 215, ch. 269, § 83
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(ff), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-101.83.
1981 Ed., § 29-383.
1973 Ed., § 29-930g.

Prior Codifications